Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.170

Exemption from licensing.

The following persons are exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter when acting within the scope of their license or profession:

(1) Engineers;

(2) Architects;

(3) Electricians licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW;

(4) Plumbers licensed under chapter 18.106 RCW;

(5) Pesticide operators licensed under chapter 17.21 RCW;

(6) Structural pest inspectors licensed under chapter 15.58 RCW; or

(7) Certified real estate appraisers licensed under chapter 18.140 RCW.

[ 2008 c 119 s 17.]